test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuárháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárk´kán
    vuárkká+N+Par: vuárk´kád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: vuárhái
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  vuárháiguin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuárháittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: luáhái
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáháittáá

  Noun - kuávská:
    kuávská+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávská
    kuávská+N?Sg+Acc: kuávská
    kuávská+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávskást
    kuávská+N+Sg+Com:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávskáttáá
    kuávská+N+Ess:  kuávskán
    kuávská+N+Par: kuávskád
    kuávská+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávskáh
    kuávská+N+Pl+Gen: kuávskái
    kuávská+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávskáid
    kuávská+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávskáin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Com:  kuávskáiguin
    kuávská+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávskáittáá
  
  Noun - kuáhčá:
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávčá
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávčást
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Com:  kuávččáin
    kuáhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávčáttáá
    kuáhčá+N+Ess:  kuáhčán
    kuáhčá+N+Par: kuáhčád
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávčáh
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Gen: kuávčái
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávčáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávččáid
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávčáin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Com:  kuávčáiguin
    kuáhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávčáittáá
  
  Noun - sááhá:
    sááhá+N+Sg+Nom:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Gen:  sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Acc: sááhá
    sááhá+N+Sg+Ill:  sááhán
    sááhá+N+Sg+Loc:  sááhást
    sááhá+N+Sg+Com:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Sg+Abe:  sáháttáá
    sááhá+N+Ess:  sááhhán
    sááhá+N+Par: sááhhád
    sááhá+N+Pl+Nom:  sááháh
    sááhá+N+Pl+Gen:  [sááhái, sáhái]
    sááhá+N+Pl+Acc:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Ill:  sááháid
    sááhá+N+Pl+Loc:  sááháin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Com:  sáháiguin
    sááhá+N+Pl+Abe:  sáháittáá

  Noun - páájá:
    páájá+N+Sg+Nom:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Gen:  páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Acc: páájá
    páájá+N+Sg+Ill:  pááján
    páájá+N+Sg+Loc:  páájást
    páájá+N+Sg+Com:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Sg+Abe:  pájáttáá
    páájá+N+Ess:  pááiján
    páájá+N+Par: pááijád
    páájá+N+Pl+Nom:  páájáh
    páájá+N+Pl+Gen:  [páájái, pájái]
    páájá+N+Pl+Acc:  páájáid
    páájá+N+Pl+Ill:  [páájáid, páijáid]
    páájá+N+Pl+Loc:  páájáin
    páájá+N+Pl+Com:  pájáiguin
    páájá+N+Pl+Abe:  pájáittáá

  Noun - čááná:
    čááná+N+Sg+Nom:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Gen:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Acc:  čááná
    čááná+N+Sg+Ill:  čáánán
    čááná+N+Sg+Loc:  čáánást
    čááná+N+Sg+Com:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Sg+Abe:  čánáttáá
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnán
    čááná+N+Ess:  čáánnád
    čááná+N+Pl+Nom:  čáánáh
    čááná+N+Pl+Gen: [čáánái, čánái]
    čááná+N+Pl+Acc:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Ill:  čáánáid
    čááná+N+Pl+Loc:  čáánáin
    čááná+N+Pl+Com:  čánáiguin
    čááná+N+Pl+Abe:  čánáittáá

  Noun - čiähá:
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom:  čiähá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen:  čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Acc:  čiävá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill:  čiähán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc:  čiävást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com:  čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Sg+Abe:  čiäváttáá
    čiähá+N+Ess:  čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom:  čiäváh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: čiävái
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc:  čiäváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill:  čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc:  čiäváin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com:  čiäváiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe:  čiäváittáá

  Noun - kiälkká:
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Nom:  kiälkká
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Gen:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Acc:  kiälhá
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Ill:  kiälkán
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Loc:  kiälhást
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Com:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Sg+Abe:  kiälháttáá
    kiälkká+N+Ess:  kiälkkán
    kiälkká+N+Par:  kiälkkád
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Nom:  kiälháh
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Gen: kiälhái
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Acc:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Ill:  kiälháid
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Loc:  kiälháin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Com:  kiälháiguin
    kiälkká+N+Pl+Abe:  kiälháittáá

  Noun - miärkká:
    miärkká+N+Sg+Nom:  miärkká
    miärkká+N+Sg+Gen:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Acc:  miärhá
    miärkká+N+Sg+Ill:  miärkán
    miärkká+N+Sg+Loc:  miärhást
    miärkká+N+Sg+Com:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Sg+Abe:  miärháttáá
    miärkká+N+Ess:  miärkkán
    miärkká+N+Par:  miärˊkkád
    miärkká+N+Pl+Nom:  miärháh
    miärkká+N+Pl+Gen: miärhái
    miärkká+N+Pl+Acc:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Ill:  miärháid
    miärkká+N+Pl+Loc:  miärháin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Com:  miärháiguin
    miärkká+N+Pl+Abe:  miärháittáá

  Noun - riävská:
    riävská+N+Sg+Nom:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Gen:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Acc:  riävská
    riävská+N+Sg+Ill:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Sg+Loc:  riävskást
    riävská+N+Sg+Com:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Sg+Abe:  riävskáttáá
    riävská+N+Ess:  riävskán
    riävská+N+Par: riävskád
    riävská+N+Pl+Nom:  riävskáh
    riävská+N+Pl+Gen: riävskái
    riävská+N+Pl+Acc:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Ill:  riävskáid
    riävská+N+Pl+Loc:  riävskáin
    riävská+N+Pl+Com:  riävskáiguin
    riävská+N+Pl+Abe:  riävskáittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Par:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: riäđhái
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäđháittáá

  Noun - vuástá:
    vuástá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuástá
    vuástá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuástást
    vuástá+N+Sg+Com:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuástáttáá
    vuástá+N+Ess:  vuástán
    vuástá+N+Par: vuástád
    vuástá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuástáh
    vuástá+N+Pl+Gen: vuástái
    vuástá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuástáid
    vuástá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuástáin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Com:  vuástáiguin
    vuástá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuástáittáá
